Utah statutes.
54-17-701.   Rules for carbon capture and geological storage.
(1)  By January 1, 2011, the Division of Water Quality and the Division of Air
Quality, on behalf of the Board of Water Quality and the Board of Air Quality,
respectively, in collaboration with the commission and the Division of Oil,
Gas, and Mining and the Utah Geological Survey, shall present recommended
rules to the Legislature's Administrative Rules Review Committee for the
following in connection with carbon capture and accompanying geological
sequestration of captured carbon:
(a)  site characterization approval;
(b)  geomechanical, geochemical, and hydrogeological simulation;
(c)  risk assessment;
(d)  mitigation and remediation protocols;
(e)  issuance of permits for test, injection, and monitoring wells;
(f)  specifications for the drilling, construction, and maintenance of wells;
(g)  issues concerning ownership of subsurface rights and pore space;
(h)  allowed composition of injected matter;
(i)  testing, monitoring, measurement, and verification for the entirety of
the carbon capture and geologic sequestration chain of operations, from the
point of capture of the carbon dioxide to the sequestration site;
(j)  closure and decommissioning procedure;
(k)  short- and long-term liability and indemnification for sequestration
sites;
(l)  conversion of enhanced oil recovery operations to carbon dioxide
geological sequestration sites; and
(m)  other issues as identified.
(2)  The entities listed in Subsection (1) shall report to the Legislature's
Administrative Rules Review Committee any proposals for additional statutory
changes needed to implement rules contemplated under Subsection (1).
(3)  On or before July 1, 2009, the entities listed in Subsection (1) shall
submit to the Legislature's Public Utilities and Technology and Natural
Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committees a progress report
on the development of the recommended rules required by this part.
(4)  The recommended rules developed under this section apply to the injection
of carbon dioxide and other associated injectants in allowable types of
geological formations for the purpose of reducing emissions to the atmosphere
through long-term geological sequestration as required by law or undertaken
voluntarily or for subsequent beneficial reuse.
(5)  The recommended rules developed under this section do not apply to the
injection of fluids through the use of Class II injection wells as defined in
40 C.F.R. 144.6(b) for the purpose of enhanced hydrocarbon recovery.
(6)  Rules recommended under this section shall:
(a)  ensure that adequate health and safety standards are met;
(b)  minimize the risk of unacceptable leakage from the injection well and
injection zone for carbon capture and geologic sequestration; and
(c)  provide adequate regulatory oversight and public information concerning
carbon capture and geologic sequestration.
